Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2682.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 14, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-1971, to read: START_STATUTE41-1971. Rental assistance program; rules; requirements; notice A. The department shall establish and administer THE RENTAL assistance program. The department shall adopt rules governing the forms, process and criteria for the program and shall make all forms available on the department's website for tenants in this state to apply. B. To be eligible to apply for the rental assistance program pursuant to this section, a tenant must meet all of the following requirements: 1. Have AT LEAST ONE CHILD UNDER THE AGE OF EIGHTEEN living IN THE RENTAL HOME. 2. Have been living in the RENTAL HOME FOR AT LEAST TWELVE MONTHS. 3. Not be MORE THAN TWO MONTHS BEHIND IN RENT. 4. Not accept RENTAL ASSISTANCE FROM any other SOURCE. 5. SHOW PROOF OF INCOME TO PAY THE RENT GOING FORWARD after the rental assistance. 6. Be facing an UNEXPECTED AND TEMPORARY FINANCIAL EMERGENCY. C. The department shall approve or deny an application for the rental assistance program within five business days after receiving the tenant's application and send written notice of its decision to the tenant and the landlord. A written notice of approval shall include the total amount of rental assistance granted and an accounting of the specific months the rental assistance payments will cover. D. Rental assistance may be granted to a tenant only ONCE every twelve months. Tenants are eligible to RECEIVE rental ASSISTANCE for up to two months or of $5,000, which ever is less. If approved, the rental ASSISTANCE payment shall be paid directly to the landlord. If the landlord refuses to directly accept the rental assistance payment from the department, the department may issue the payment directly to the tenant and shall NOTIFY the landlord of the payment. E. A tenant is not required to be DELINQUENT on rent to apply for the program. Rental assistance may cover upcoming rental payments. Any prospective rental payments included in the rental assistance shall be delineated in the written notice of approval to the tenant and the landlord pursuant to subsection C of this section. F. If a tenant is DELINQUENT on rent, the landlord shall verify with the department the balance that is due. If the landlord refuses to provide to the department any information regarding the balance, the tenant shall provide to the department the details regarding the balance. G. The department shall establish or contract with a provider in this state to establish a free financial literacy class for tenants requesting rental assistance. H. Notwithstanding any other law, a landlord that accepts rental ASSISTANCE payments from the department or the tenant may not evict the tenant for nonpayment of rent for the months that are covered by the rental ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Appropriation; department of economic security; exemption A. The sum of $5,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of economic security for the purposes of the rental assistance program established by section 41-1971, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.